Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1861.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 86.1 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Advanced detection and monitoring system” means any system


capable of detecting and classifying objects such as pedestrians and


vehicles at railroad crossings, using technologies such as light


detection and ranging sensors, thermal sensors, and high-resolution


cameras, in conjunction with artificial intelligence or machine


learning;





Req. No. 3370 Page 1


2. “Hazard assessment” means the process of analyzing detected


objects to determine whether a safety risk exists based on


predefined criteria; and


3. “Real-time alerts” means automated notifications generated


to warn train crews, operations centers, or other stakeholders of


safety hazards.


B. The Corporation Commission and the Department of


Transportation shall identify a number of extra hazardous crossings,


as provided for in Section 86 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


that shall, to the extent feasible, incorporate advanced detection


and monitoring systems capable of:


1. Detecting and classifying objects along the crossing and its


approaches;


2. Analyzing object behavior in real-time to identify safety


risks;


3. Generating real-time alerts to warn train crews, operation


personnel, and other relevant parties of potential hazards;


4. Generating data sufficient to identify leading indicators of


potential hazards; and


5. Providing integration capability with existing and future


rail operation protocols, including positive train control (PTC)


systems.


C. The Commission and Department, in consultation with rail


operators and safety experts, shall:

Req. No. 3370 Page 2


1. Develop standards and specifications for the deployment of


advanced detection and monitoring systems at the selected extra


hazardous crossings;


2. Provide technical assistance to rail operators in


implementing advanced detection and monitoring systems; and


3. Provide financial support for the implementation of advanced


detection and monitoring systems from the Oklahoma Railroad


Maintenance Revolving Fund, as created in Section 309 of Title 66 of


the Oklahoma Statutes.


D. The Commission and Department shall, beginning November 1,


2028, prepare a report on the implementation of advanced detection


and monitoring systems at the selected extra hazardous crossings.


Such report shall include data on hazard detection, real-time alerts


issued, incidents prevented, and comparative safety data at the


crossing before and after implementation. Such report shall be


electronically submitted to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate,


the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Governor on or


before December 31, 2028.


SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma


Railroad Maintenance Revolving Fund from any monies not otherwise


appropriated from the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for


the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Five Million


Dollars ($5,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to


carry out the provisions of this act.

Req. No. 3370 Page 3


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3370 MSBB 1/15/2026 7:01:28 AM











































Req. No. 3370 Page 4